Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 251.335 is amended to read:
251.335. (1) As used in this section, “district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 255.012.
(2) [ Not later than the date specified by the  Secretary of State, ] Any candidate for nomination or
election to county, city or special district office within  the county, or an agent of the candidate,
may file with  the county clerk of a county that prepares a county voters’ pamphlet a portrait of the
candidate and a typewritten  statement of the reasons the candidate should be elected. The portrait
and statement must comply with the applicable rules of the Secretary of State.
(3)(a) A candidate or agent of the  candidate may file a portrait and statement described
in subsection (2) of this section not sooner than the 120th day and not later than  the 68th
day before the primary election.
(b) A candidate or agent of the candidate may file a  portrait and statement described in
subsection (2) of this section not sooner than the  120th day and not later than the 70th day
before the general election.
(c) The Secretary of State shall establish by rule the date by which a candidate  or agent
of the candidate may file a portrait and statement described in  subsection (2) of this section
for an election to fill a vacancy or an election other than a primary or general election.
[(3)] (4) The county clerk may not accept the filing of a statement  or portrait of any candidate
unless the filing is accompanied by the appropriate fee described in ORS 251.325.
[(4)] (5) At the bottom of  each allotted space of the county voters’ pamphlet containing a por-
trait and statement filed by a candidate, the county clerk shall include:
(a) A statement identifying the person who furnished the portrait and statement; and
(b) A disclaimer in boldfaced type in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
The above information has not been verified for accuracy by the county.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 578 (SB 578-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 578 (SB 578-INTRO) Page 2